Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.505

Waiver of notice.

Whenever any notice is required to be given to any member, shareholder or director of a corporation under the provisions of this chapter or under the provisions of the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the corporation, a waiver thereof in writing signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether made before or given after the time stated therein, shall be equivalent to the giving of such notice.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 101.]